District of Columbia statutes.
1-621.14

Continued health benefits coverage.

A District government employee who is separated from service, or an employee’s dependent who ceases to be a dependent, may be eligible for extended health benefit coverage in accordance with rules issued by the Mayor. The rules shall be as consistent as possible with federal regulations governing extended health benefits for District government employees enrolled in the Federal Employee Health Benefits Plan.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2114
as added Mar. 2, 1991, D.C. Law 8-190, § 2(d), 37 DCR 6721
Termination of domestic partnerships, continued health benefits coverage, see § 32-702.
This section is referenced in § 32-702.
1981 Ed., § 1-622.14.
The “Federal Employee Health Benefits Plan”, referred to in the second sentence, is treated in 5 U.S.C., Chapter 89.
Mayor authorized to enter agreements to modify health benefits contracts: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 1-611.03.